Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.060

Staff.

The executive director shall employ a staff who shall be state employees pursuant to Title 41 RCW and prescribe their duties as may be necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 6.]